Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Compulsory Attendance

§ 21-4-101.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

“Unexcused absence” means the absence, as defined in the rules of the local board of trustees pursuant to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxix);

“Habitual truant” means any child who disobeys reasonable and lawful demands of the child’s parent, guardian, custodian or other proper authority to attend school if required under W.S.

21-4-102

and as further defined in the rules of the local board of trustees pursuant to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxix);

“Private school” is any nonpublic, elementary or secondary school providing a basic academic educational program for children and may include parochial and church or religious schools and home-based educational programs;

“Parochial, church or religious school” is one operated under the auspices or control of a local church or religious congregation or a denomination established to promote and promulgate the commonly held religious doctrines of the group though it may also include basic academic subjects in its curriculum. Nothing contained in W.S.

21-4-102

(b),

21-2-401

or

21-2-406

grants to the state of Wyoming or any of its officers, agencies or subdivisions any right or authority to control, manage, supervise or make any suggestions as to the control, management or supervision of any parochial, church or religious school which meets the requirements of W.S.

21-2-406

(a);

A home-based educational program means a program of educational instruction provided to a child by the child’s parent or legal guardian or by a person designated by the parent or legal guardian. An instructional program provided to more than one (1) family unit does not constitute a home-based educational program;

“Basic academic educational program” is one that provides a sequentially progressive curriculum of fundamental instruction in reading, writing, mathematics, civics, history, literature and science. These curriculum requirements do not require any private school or home-based educational program to include in its curriculum any concept, topic or practice in conflict with its religious doctrines or to exclude from its curriculum any concept, topic or practice consistent with its religious doctrines;

“Willful absenteeism” means exceeding the limit of unexcused absences as defined in the rules of the local board of trustees pursuant to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxix) when the excess absences are the result of a parent’s, guardian’s or custodian’s willful failure, neglect or refusal to require a child’s regular attendance at school in accordance with W.S. 21-4-102.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 47; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-47; Laws 1985, ch. 142, § 1; 2004, ch. 112, § 1; 2022 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to exemptions, see §§ 31-2-201(d)(vii)(C) and 31-7-107(a)(v).

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(iv), added “which meets the requirements of W.S. 21-2-406(a)” at the end.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(i), substituted “rules” for “policies,” “pursuant to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxix)” for “, of any child required by this article to attend school when such absence is not excused to the satisfaction of the board of trustees by the parent, guardian, or other person having control of such child”; rewrote (a)(ii), which read, “‘Habitual truant’ means any child with five (5) or more unexcused absences in any one (1) school year”; and added (a)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-4-102.
When attendance required; exemptions; withdrawal.

Every parent, guardian or other person having control or charge of any child who is a resident of this state and whose seventh birthday falls on or before August 1, or September 15 if the child started kindergarten pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii), of any year and who has not yet attained his sixteenth birthday or completed the tenth grade shall be required to send such child to, and such child shall be required to attend, a public or private school each year, during the entire time that the public schools shall be in session in the district in which the pupil resides; provided, that the board of trustees of each school district may exempt any child from the operation of this article when:

The board believes that compulsory attendance in school would be detrimental to the mental or physical health of such child or the other children in the school; provided, the board may designate at the expense of the district a medical doctor of its choice to guide it and support it in its decision;

The board feels that compulsory school attendance might work undue hardship. The board may conduct a hearing on issues pursuant to this paragraph by executive session; or

The child has been legally excluded from the regular schools pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

21-4-306

.

A home-based educational program shall meet the requirements of a basic academic educational program pursuant to W.S. 21-4-101(a)(vi). It shall be the responsibility of every person administering a home-based educational program to submit a curriculum to the local board of trustees each year showing that the program complies with the requirements of this subsection. Failure to submit a curriculum showing compliance is prima facie evidence that the home-based educational program does not meet the requirements of this article.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, the parent, guardian or other person having control or charge of any child under the age of eighteen (18), who has not otherwise notified the district of enrolling that child in a different school district or in a private school or home-based educational program, shall meet in person with a school district counselor or administrator to provide the school district with written consent to the withdrawal of that child from school attendance. The written consent to withdrawal shall include a separate provision authorizing the release of the student’s identity and address to the Wyoming national guard youth challenge program, as established by W.S.

19-9-701

, for the sole purpose of recruitment into the Wyoming national guard youth challenge program.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 93, § 1; 1909, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1956; C.S. 1920, § 2260; Laws 1923, ch. 42, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-334; C.S. 1945, § 67-1601; W.S. 1957, § 21-244; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 48; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-48; Laws 1985, ch. 142, § 1; 1998, ch. 57, § 1; 2010, ch. 25, § 1; 2014 ch. 72, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (c).

The 2014 amendment,

in (c), added the second sentence.

Laws 2014, ch. 72, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 1, 2021, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “before August 1, or September 15 if the child started kindergarten pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxvii)” for “before September 15.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 159, § 2, provides: “The change in the age requirement for registering in the first grade as provided in this act shall not apply to students who were registered to attend kindergarten in the public schools of this state during school year 2020–2021.”

Stated

in

Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Religious beliefs of parents as defense to prosecution for failure to comply with compulsory education law, 3 ALR2d 1401.

What constitutes “private school” within statute making attendance at such a school compliance with compulsory school attendance law, 65 ALR3d 1222.

Validity, construction, and application of statute, regulation, or policy governing home schooling or affecting rights of home-schooled students, 70 ALR5th 169.

§ 21-4-103.
Enforcement of article; appointment and compensation of attendance officers.

The primary responsibility for the enforcement of this article shall be upon the board of trustees of the school district, which shall appoint an attendance officer or officers to carry out the provisions of this article. Said officer shall be paid out of the district treasury such sum as may be provided in the order of appointment.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 93, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1957; C.S. 1920, § 2261; Laws 1923, ch. 98, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-335; Laws 1945, ch. 169, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 67-1602; W.S. 1957, § 21-246; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 49; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-49.

Stated in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 21-4-104.
Duties of attendance officers.

Subject to the rules and policies of the board of trustees, it shall be the duty of each attendance officer to:

Counsel with students, parents, guardians or custodians and teachers; and to investigate the causes of unexcused absences, habitual truancy and willful absenteeism;

Give written notice to the parent, guardian, or custodian of any child having an unexcused absence that the attendance of such child at school is required by law under W.S.

21-4-102

and local board rules pursuant to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxix). If after such notice has been given, the child has continued unexcused absences in violation of W.S.

21-4-102

or local board of trustees rules under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxix) and the attendance officer reasonably believes that the unexcused absences were due to neglect as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(vii), willful absenteeism or habitual truancy, the attendance officer shall proceed in accordance with W.S.

21-4-107

.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 93, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1957; C.S. 1920, § 2261; Laws 1923, ch. 98, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-335; Laws 1945, ch. 169, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 67-1602; W.S. 1957, § 21-246; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 50; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-50; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2022 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), deleted “a justice of the peace of the proper county or” following “of such child before.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “rules and policies” for “policy” in the introductory language of (a); added “, habitual truancy and willful absenteeism” in (a)(i); and rewrote (a)(ii), which read, “Give written notice to the parent, guardian, or custodian of any child having an unexcused absence that the attendance of such child at school is required by law. If after such notice has been given, the child has a second unexcused absence, which the attendance officer reasonably believes was due to the willful neglect or failure of the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child, then he shall make and file a complaint against such parent, guardian, or custodian of such child before the district court for the violation of W.S.

21-4-102

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 21-4-105.
Penalty for failure of parent, guardian or custodian to comply with article.

Any parent, guardian or custodian of any child to whom this article applies who willfully fails, neglects or refuses to comply with the provisions of this article may be punished by not more than ten (10) days of community service and subject to proceedings under the Child Protection Act, W.S.

14-3-401

et seq., or the Children In Need of Supervision Act, W.S.

14-6-401

et seq., or both.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 93, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1957; C.S. 1920, § 2261; Laws 1923, ch. 98, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-335; Laws 1945, ch. 169, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 67-1602; W.S. 1957, § 21-246; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 51; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-51; 2022 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “may” for “shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall,” “not more than ten (10) days of community service and subject to proceedings under the Child Protection Act, W.S.

14-3-401

et seq., or the Children In Need of Supervision Act, W.S.

14-6-401

et seq., or both” for “a fine of not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail not more than ten (10) days or by both such fine and imprisonment,” and made a stylistic change.

Stated in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 21-4-106.
List of children of school age to be furnished; notice of unexcused absences.

At the beginning of each school year, the board of trustees shall furnish each district attendance officer a list of the names of the children of compulsory school age within the district who are enumerated on the regular enumeration lists. The person in charge of each school within the district shall notify each district attendance officer promptly in writing of all cases of unexcused absence so that the attendance officer may proceed according to the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 93, § 3; 1909, ch. 31, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1958; C.S. 1920, § 2262; Laws 1927, ch. 89, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 99-336; C.S. 1945, § 67-1603; W.S. 1957, § 21-247; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 52; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-52.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of state or local government regulation requiring private school to report attendance and similar information to government — post-Yoder cases, 8 ALR5th 875.

§ 21-4-107.
Notice to district attorney and tribe of habitual truancy or willful absenteeism; duty of district attorney.

When the attendance officer of any school district determines that a child is an habitual truant or has been absent due to willful absenteeism as defined by this article the attendance officer shall notify the board of trustees and the district attorney who may initiate proceedings in the interest of the child under the Child Protection Act, W.S.

14-3-401

et seq., or the Children In Need of Supervision Act, W.S.

14-6-401

et seq., as appropriate. If the child is an Indian child as defined in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901 et seq., the district attorney shall notify the child’s tribe and may initiate proceedings in the interest of the child if authorized to do so under state and federal law. If the Indian child resides on the Wind River Indian Reservation, the attendance officer shall notify the Wind River Tribal Court prosecutor and the tribal prosecutor may initiate proceedings pursuant to applicable tribal law and order codes.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 53; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-53; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "Juvenile Justice Act" for "Juvenile Court Act."

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote the section, which read, “When the board of trustees of any school district shall determine that a child is an habitual truant as defined by this article the board or its attendance officer shall notify the district attorney who shall then initiate proceedings in the interest of the child under the Juvenile Justice Act.”

Juvenile Court Act. —

The Juvenile Court Act, enacted by Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 1, was codified as §

14-8-101

et seq. Title 14 was revised in 1978. For present similar provisions, see the Juvenile Justice Act, §§

14-6-201

through

14-6-252

.

Stated in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Truancy as indicative of delinquency or incorrigibility, justifying commitment of infant or juvenile, 5 ALR4th 1211.